Illinois, session 104th, HB4383.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Legislative Information System Act is 5amended by changing Section 5.09 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 145/5.09)7    Sec. 5.09. Public computer access; legislative 8information. To make available to the public all of the 9following information in electronic form:10        (1) On or before July 1, 1999, the weekly schedule of 11    legislative floor sessions for each of the 2 houses of the 12    General Assembly together with a list of matters pending 13    before them and the weekly schedule of legislative 14    committee hearings together with matters scheduled for 15    their consideration.16        (2) On or before July 1, 1999, a list of the committees 17    of the General Assembly and their members.18        (3) On or before July 1, 1999, the text of each bill 19    and resolution introduced and of each engrossed, enrolled, 20    and re-enrolled bill and resolution and the text of each 21    adopted amendment and conference committee report.22        (4) On or before July 1, 1999, a synopsis of items 23    specified in paragraph (3) of this Section, together with   HB4383- 2 -LRB104 15431 SPS 28586 b1    a summary of legislative and gubernatorial actions 2    regarding each bill and resolution introduced.3        (5) On or before July 1, 1999, the Rules of the House 4    and the Senate of the General Assembly.5        (6) Before the conclusion of the Ninety-second General 6    Assembly, the text of Public Acts.7        (7) Before the conclusion of the Ninety-second General 8    Assembly, the Illinois Compiled Statutes.9        (8) Before the conclusion of the Ninety-second General 10    Assembly, the Constitution of the United States and the 11    Constitution of the State of Illinois.12        (9) Before the conclusion of the Ninety-second General 13    Assembly, the text of the Illinois Administrative Code.14        (10) Before the conclusion of the Ninety-second 15    General Assembly, the most current issue of the Illinois 16    Register published on or after the effective date of this 17    amendatory Act of 1998.18        (11) Any other information that the Joint Committee on 19    Legislative Support Services elects to make available.20    The information shall be made available to the public 21through a website maintained by the System. The information 22may also be made available by any other means of access that 23would facilitate public access to the information. 24    Any documentation that describes the electronic digital 25formats of the information shall be made available through a 26website maintained by the System.   HB4383- 3 -LRB104 15431 SPS 28586 b1    Personal information concerning a person who accesses this 2public information may be maintained only for the purpose of 3providing service to the person.4    No fee or other charge may be imposed by the Legislative 5Information System as a condition of accessing the 6information, except that a reasonable fee may be charged for 7any customized services and shall be deposited into the 8General Assembly Computer Equipment Revolving Fund.9    The electronic public access provided through the System's 10website shall be in addition to any other electronic or print 11distribution of the information.12    Within one-year after the effective date of this 13amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly, to the extent 14practicable, the System shall use a free translation tool to 15enable translation into multiple languages of the information 16made available to the public through the website maintained by 17the System. The translation tool shall, at a minimum, 18translate the following content on the website maintained by 19the System: the home page; information regarding the members 20of the House of Representatives and the Senate, including, but 21not limited to, each member's biography, committee 22assignments, and sponsored bills; information regarding the 23membership of, bills assigned to, and meeting schedules of 24each standing and special committee of the House of 25Representatives and the Senate; information on the procedural 26status of each bill and resolution, together with any   HB4383- 4 -LRB104 15431 SPS 28586 b1amendments thereto, and appointment message filed in the House 2of Representatives or the Senate, including both general 3information and user-selected information (through the "My 4Legislation" function or otherwise), but not including the 5synopsis or text of any bill or resolution, or any amendment 6thereto, or any appointment message, Public Act, or Executive 7Order; information regarding previous General Assemblies, not 8including the synopsis or text of any bill or resolution, or 9any amendment thereto, or any appointment message, Public Act, 10or Executive Order; contact information for the General 11Assembly, legislative support service agencies, and other 12related offices in the Capitol Complex; and information 13regarding access for persons with disabilities. The System 14may, in its discretion, provide for additional content to be 15translated. The languages available for translation shall be 16those provided by the translation tool. Before a user accesses 17translated information, the System shall ensure that a 18disclaimer is first displayed, stating that: the translated 19information is offered as a convenience and should not be 20considered accurate as to the translation of the text in 21question; and the English language version is the official and 22authoritative version of the text in question.23    As soon as practicable after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the System shall 25make available to the public through the website maintained by 26the System the audio and video recordings of all committee   HB4383- 5 -LRB104 15431 SPS 28586 b1hearings of the General Assembly occurring on or after the 2effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 3Assembly. The committee hearing audio and video recordings 4made available by the System shall be posted on the website 5maintained by the System for at least 30 days after the 6committee hearing at which the recording was made. 7    No action taken under this Section shall be deemed to 8alter or relinquish any copyright or other proprietary 9interest or entitlement of the State of Illinois relating to 10any of the information made available under this Section.11    The information shall be made available as provided in 12this Section in the shortest practicable time after it is 13publicly available in any other form; provided that the System 14may make information available under this Section only if the 15availability in no way reduces the quality and timeliness of 16service available to and required under this Act for 17legislative users and does not unduly burden the General 18Assembly or its support services agencies. Failure to provide 19information under this Section does not affect the validity of 20any action of the General Assembly. The General Assembly and 21the State of Illinois are not liable for the accuracy, 22availability, or use of the information provided under this 23Section.24(Source: P.A. 100-320, eff. 8-24-17.)